Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNEAPOLIS PARK AND RECREATION BOARD; NORTH COMMONS PARK.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $12,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Metropolitan Council for a grant to the Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board to design, construct, and equip improvements to North Commons Park in the city of Minneapolis to implement elements of the North Commons Improvement Project, including the renovation of the community building with indoor sports, gathering, and arts spaces, sports fields, and renovation and relocation of the water park. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 3, section 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $12,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end